Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-496] Duties and roles of the agent
and educational representative. (a) The agent and educational
representative shall have the same duties and responsibilities.

(b) The agent and the educational
representative shall be afforded the opportunity to participate in meetings
with respect to:

(1) The identification, evaluation, and educational
placement of the student;

(2) The provision of free, appropriate public
education to the student; and

(3) The provision of input in accordance with the adult
student's individual instructions or other wishes, if any, to the extent
known.

Otherwise, the agent and the educational
representative shall participate in accordance with the determination of the
student's best interest. In determining the student's best interest, the
student's personal values, to the extent known, shall be taken into
consideration. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next